Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 2

Pension Review

3-9-201. Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Tennessee Public Pension Review Act.”

Acts 1981, ch. 137, § 1.

Cross-References. Minimum municipal fire and police retirement allowances, title 6, ch. 54, part 8.

3-9-202. “Local government retirement plan” defined.

For the purposes of this part, “local government retirement plan” means any retirement plan of any county, municipality, school district, utility district, development district, or any other subdivision of the state which operates a public retirement plan for its employees for which the governmental unit has liability.

Acts 1981, ch. 137, § 1.

3-9-203. Report on status of retirement plan.

Upon the request of the council on pensions and insurance, the chief executive officer or the plan administrator shall file a report on the actuarial and financial status of the retirement plan in effect for employees of the local government unit. The report shall be on such forms as may be prescribed by the secretary of the council and shall cover the most recently ended plan year ending on or before June 30 of the year of the request. The report shall be filed with the secretary of the council within ninety (90) calendar days from the date of the request, unless the secretary extends the time in writing.

Acts 1981, ch. 137, § 1; 2006, ch. 870, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. The council on pensions and insurance was formerly the council on pensions and retirement, but was renamed in 1989.

3-9-204. Contents of report.

The report as specified in §3-9-203 shall include the following:

The most recent actuarial valuation of the system conducted by a professionally qualified actuary;

Year-end financial statements, including the auditor's statement, when available; and

Publications by the plan's administrator to the members and/or other interested parties.

Acts 1981, ch. 137, § 1.